Utah statutes.
3-1-23.   Use of term "cooperative" limited.

No person, firm, corporation, or association, domestic or foreign, hereafter commencing business in this state shall use the word "cooperative" as a part of its corporate or business name unless it has complied with the provisions of this act or some other statute of this state relating to co-operative associations. A foreign association organized under and complying with the co-operative law of the state of such association's creation shall be entitled to use the term "cooperative" in this state if it has obtained the privilege of doing business in this state.



No Change Since 1953

